Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Article 1. General Provisions

§ 22-5-101.
How candidates nominated.

Nominations of candidates for all offices filled at a general election, except school and community college district offices and special district offices, may be made by primary election, by petition for nomination as an independent candidate as provided in W.S.

22-5-301

through

22-5-308

or by convention as provided in W.S.

22-4-303

and

22-4-406

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-54; Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 2; 1991, ch. 243, § 2.

Stated

in

Blomquist v. Thomson, 591 F. Supp. 768, 1984 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 19379 (D. Wyo. 1984).

§ 22-5-102.
Eligibility to be a candidate for state legislature; residency.

For the purpose of meeting residency requirements of the Wyoming constitution, a person shall not be a candidate for the state legislature from a legislative district unless he has been a resident of that legislative district for at least one (1) year next preceding his election. In any general election year in which a plan of legislative districts is required but has not been enacted into law at least one (1) year prior to the applicable filing periods, a person may be a candidate for the state legislature from a legislative district if he:

Is a resident of the legislative district on the date he files an application under W.S.

22-5-204

or a petition under W.S.

22-5-301

; and

Has been a resident of a county for at least one (1) year next preceding his election in which any portion of that legislative district is located.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 1, § 4; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 1, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to terms and qualifications of the members of the legislative department, see art. 3, § 2, Wyo. Const.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 22-5-103.
Limits on ballot access; state offices.

Notwithstanding any other provision of Wyoming law, the secretary of state or other authorized official shall not certify the name of any person as the nominee or candidate for the office sought, nor shall that person be elected nor serve in that office if the following will occur:

The person, by the end of the current term of office will have served, or but for resignation, would have served eight (8) or more years in any sixteen (16) year period in the office for which the candidate is seeking nomination or election, except, that any time served in that particular office prior to January 1, 1993, shall not be counted for purposes of this term limit. This provision shall apply to the office of governor.

and (iii) Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 241, § 1.

History.

1992 Initiative No. 1, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

22-5-102

; Laws 1995, ch. 12, § 1; 2005, ch. 241, § 1; 2015 ch. 76, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, repealed (a)(ii) and (a)(iii), pertaining to term limits for persons who had served, or but for resignation would have served, 12 or more years in a 24-year period.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a)(i), substituted “office of governor” for “offices of governor, secretary of state, state auditor, state treasurer, and state superintendent of public instruction.”

Editor's notes. —

This section was enacted by initiative, approved by the voters on November 3, 1992, certified by the secretary of state on November 12, 1992, and effective February 10, 1993.

1992 Initiative No. 1, § 2, provides:

This section was enacted as §

22-5-102

. As there already was a §

22-5-102

, this section has been renumbered as §

22-5-103

.

Laws 1995, ch. 12, § 2, provides: “The intent of this act is to permit state representatives to serve the same number of years as state senators while maintaining term limits.”

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Constitutionality. —

Wyo. Const. art. 1, § 3 prohibited the passage of any law conditioning political rights and privileges upon a circumstance or condition other than those enumerated. Because Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

22-5-103

conditioned the right to hold the office of Secretary of State on incumbency, not an enumerated condition, it was unconstitutional. Maxfield v. State, 2013 WY 14, 294 P.3d 895,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2013).

Term limit law, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

22-5-103

, as it applies to candidates for the state legislature, whether adopted by initiative or legislative action, is unconstitutional and unenforceable because it violates art. 1, § 3 and art. 3, §§ 2 and 52(g), Wyo. Const. No law, whether enacted by the legislature through the legislative process or by the people through the initiative process, may condition political rights and privileges upon a circumstance or condition such as incumbency. Cathcart v. Meyer, 2004 WY 49, 88 P.3d 1050,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 2004).

§ 22-5-104.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 241, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from 1992 Initiative No. 1, § 1, provided term limits for federal offices.

Laws 2005, ch. 241, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

§ 22-5-105.
Scope of limitations.

The term limits and ballot access restrictions set forth above shall apply only to the specific office referenced in which the person previously served. It is not the intent that this act [§§

22-5-103

through

22-5-106

] preclude or prohibit a person from seeking nomination or election to any other office for which the referenced term limit or ballot access restriction is not applicable.

History.

1992 Initiative No. 1, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

22-5-104

.

Editor's notes. —

See note under the same heading at §

22-5-103

.

This section was enacted as §

22-5-104

. As there already was a §

22-5-104

, this section has been renumbered as §

22-5-105

.

§ 22-5-106.
Severability.

If any part of this measure [§§

22-5-103

through

22-5-106

] or the application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or application, which reasonably can be given effect without the invalid provision or applications.

History.

1992 Initiative No. 1, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

22-5-105

.

Editor's notes. —

See note under the same heading at §

22-5-103

.

This section was enacted as §

22-5-105

. As there already was a §

22-5-105

, this section has been renumbered as §

22-5-106

.